test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-wîcihîw_gt-norm.yaml
      # 12Pl
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO: î-wî-wîcihâyahk
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO+Var/East: î-wî-wîcihahk
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO: î-wî-wîcihâyahkwâw
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO+Var/East: î-wî-wîcihahkwâw
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-wî-wîcihimâyahk
      # PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+XO: PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+XO

      # 2Pl
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1SgO: î-wî-wîcihiyîk
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3SgO: î-wî-wîcihâyîk
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO: î-wî-wîcihiyâhk
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO: î-wî-wîcihâyîkwâw
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO+Var/East: î-wî-wîcihâyîkok
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-wî-wîcihimâyîk
      # PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+XO: PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+XO

      # 3Pl
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1SgO: [î-wî-wîcihitwâw, î-wî-wîcihicik]
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2SgO: î-wî-wîcihiskwâw
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO: î-wî-wîcihikoyâhkwâw
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO+Var/East: î-wî-wîcihiyamihcik
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO: î-wî-wîcihikoyahkwâw
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO+Var/East: î-wî-wîcihitahkwâw
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO: î-wî-wîcihikoyîkwâw
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO+Var/East: î-wî-wîcihitîkwâw
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-wî-wîcihâcik
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: î-wî-wîcihimâcik
      # PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+XO: PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+XO

      # 4Sg/Pl
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: î-wî-wîcihimit
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: î-wî-wîcihimisk
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: î-wî-wîcihikot
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: î-wî-wîcihikoyâhk
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: î-wî-wîcihikoyahk
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: î-wî-wîcihikoyîk
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: î-wî-wîcihikocik
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: î-wî-wîcihâthit
      # PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+XO: PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+XO

      # 5Sg/Pl
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-wî-wîcihikothit

      # X
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+1SgO: î-wî-wîcihikawiyân
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+2SgO: î-wî-wîcihikawiyan
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+3SgO: î-wî-wîcihiht
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+1PlO: î-wî-wîcihikawiyâhk
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+12PlO: î-wî-wîcihikawiyahk
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+2PlO: î-wî-wîcihikawiyîk
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+3PlO: î-wî-wîcihihcik
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+4Sg/PlO: î-wî-wîcihimiht
      

      # Fut+Def # Ind

      # 1Sg
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kika-wîcihitin
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: nika-wîcihâw
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO: kika-wîcihitinâwâw
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3PlO: nika-wîcihâwak
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: nika-wîcihimâwa
      # PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+XO: PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+XO

      # 2Sg
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kika-wîcihin
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: kika-wîcihâw
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kika-wîcihinân
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kika-wîcihâwak
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kika-wîcihimâwa
      # PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+XO: PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+XO

      # 3Sg
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kika-wîcihin
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2SgO: kika-wîcihik
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kika-wîcihinân
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+12PlO: kika-wîcihikonaw
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2PlO: kika-wîcihikowâw
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kika-wîcihâwak
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kika-wîcihimâwa
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihimîw
      # PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+XO: PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+XO

      # 1Pl
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO: kika-wîcihitinân
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3SgO: nika-wîcihânân
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO: kika-wîcihitinân
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO: nika-wîcihânânak
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: nika-wîcihimânâna
      # PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+XO: PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+XO

      # 12Pl
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3SgO: kika-wîcihânaw
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3PlO: kika-wîcihânawak
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: kika-wîcihimânawa
      # PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+XO: PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+XO

      # 2Pl
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO: kika-wîcihinâwâw
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3SgO: kika-wîcihâwâw
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO: kika-wîcihinân
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3PlO: kika-wîcihâwâwak
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: kika-wîcihimâwâwa
      # PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+XO: PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+XO

      # 3Pl
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1SgO: nika-wîcihikwak
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2SgO: kika-wîcihikwak
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1PlO: nika-wîcihikonânak
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+12PlO: kika-wîcihikonawak
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2PlO: kika-wîcihikowâwak
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihîwak
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihimîwak
      # PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+XO: PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+XO

      # 4Sg/Pl
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: nika-wîcihikothiwa
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: kika-wîcihikothiwa
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: [ka-wîcihikow, ka-wîcihik]
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: nika-wîcihikonâna
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: kika-wîcihikonawa
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: kika-wîcihikowâwa
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: [ka-wîcihikowak, ka-wîcihikwak]
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihîthiwa
      # PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+XO: PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+XO

      # 5Sg/Pl
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihikothiwa

      # X
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+1SgO: nika-wîcihikawin
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+2SgO: kika-wîcihikawin
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+3SgO: ka-wîcihâw
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+1PlO: nika-wîcihikawinân
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+12PlO: [kika-wîcihikawinaw, kika-wîcihikawinânaw]
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+2PlO: kika-wîcihikawinâwâw
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+3PlO: ka-wîcihâwak
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+4Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihâthiwa
      

      # Inf # PV/ka

      # 1Sg
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO: ka-wîcihitân
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: ka-wîcihak
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO: ka-wîcihitakwâw
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO: ka-wîcihakwâw
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO+Var/East: ka-wîcihaki
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihimak
      # PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+XO: PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+XO

      # 2Sg
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: ka-wîcihiyan
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: ka-wîcihat
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: ka-wîcihiyâhk
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: ka-wîcihacik
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihimat
      # PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+XO: PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+XO

      # 3Sg
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: ka-wîcihiyan
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2SgO: ka-wîcihisk
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: ka-wîcihiyâhk
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO: ka-wîcihikoyâhk
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO+Var/East: ka-wîcihiyamiht
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO: ka-wîcihikoyahk
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO+Var/East: ka-wîcihitahk
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO: ka-wîcihikoyîk
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO+Var/East: ka-wîcihitîk
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: ka-wîcihacik
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihimat
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihimât
      # PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+XO: PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+XO

      # 1Pl
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO: ka-wîcihitâhk
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO: ka-wîcihâyâhk
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO+Var/East: ka-wîcihâkiht
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO: ka-wîcihitâhk
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO: ka-wîcihâyâhkwâw
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO+Var/East: ka-wîcihakihcik
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihimâyâhk
      # PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+XO: PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+XO

      # 12Pl
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO: ka-wîcihâyahk
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO+Var/East: ka-wîcihahk
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO: ka-wîcihâyahkwâw
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO+Var/East: ka-wîcihahkwâw
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihimâyahk
      # PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+XO: PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+XO

      # 2Pl
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1SgO: ka-wîcihiyîk
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3SgO: ka-wîcihâyîk
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO: ka-wîcihiyâhk
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO: ka-wîcihâyîkwâw
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO+Var/East: ka-wîcihâyîkok
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihimâyîk
      # PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+XO: PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+XO

      # 3Pl
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1SgO: [ka-wîcihitwâw, ka-wîcihicik]
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2SgO: ka-wîcihiskwâw
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO: ka-wîcihikoyâhkwâw
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO+Var/East: ka-wîcihiyamihcik
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO: ka-wîcihikoyahkwâw
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO+Var/East: ka-wîcihitahkwâw
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO: ka-wîcihikoyîkwâw
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO+Var/East: ka-wîcihitîkwâw
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihâcik
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihimâcik
      # PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+XO: PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+XO

      # 4Sg/Pl
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: ka-wîcihimit
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: ka-wîcihimisk
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: ka-wîcihikot
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: ka-wîcihikoyâhk
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: ka-wîcihikoyahk
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: ka-wîcihikoyîk
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: ka-wîcihikocik
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihâthit
      # PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+XO: PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+XO

      # 5Sg/Pl
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihikothit

      # X
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+1SgO: ka-wîcihikawiyân
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+2SgO: ka-wîcihikawiyan
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+3SgO: ka-wîcihiht
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+1PlO: ka-wîcihikawiyâhk
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+12PlO: ka-wîcihikawiyahk
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+2PlO: ka-wîcihikawiyîk
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+3PlO: ka-wîcihihcik
      PV/ka+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+4Sg/PlO: ka-wîcihimiht
      

      # Inf # PV/ta

      # 1Sg
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO: ta-wîcihitân
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: ta-wîcihak
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO: ta-wîcihitakwâw
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO: ta-wîcihakwâw
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO+Var/East: ta-wîcihaki
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: ta-wîcihimak
      # PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+XO: PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+XO
